Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-207
Traffic; regulations; vehicle tax; powers.

A city of the primary class shall have the power, by ordinance, to regulate the transportation of articles through the streets, to prevent injuries to the streets from overloaded vehicles, and to provide for a vehicle license or tax.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, VIII, p. 129;

Laws 1905, c. 16, § 11, p. 212;

R.S.1913, § 4420;

C.S.1922, § 3804;

C.S.1929, § 15-207;

R.S.1943, § 15-207;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 26.
November 14, 2020